Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Commission on Judicial Fitness and Disability,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General  Fund, the following amounts, for
the following purposes:
(1) Administration.......................... $ 618,820
(2) Extraordinary expenses ............ $ 23,324
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Passed by House June 2, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 11, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5013 (HB 5013-A) Page 1